Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3906
Taking testimony in another state.

(1) In a guardianship
or protective proceeding, in addition to other procedures that may be available,
testimony of a witness who is located in another state may be offered by deposition
or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in another state.
The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a witness be taken
in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon
which the testimony is to be taken.

(2) In a guardianship
or protective proceeding, a court in this state may permit a witness located
in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone or audiovisual or
other electronic means. A court of this state shall cooperate with the court
of the other state in designating an appropriate location for the deposition
or testimony.

(3) Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court
of this state by technological means that do not produce an original writing
may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the best evidence
rule.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 10.